Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-284.01
Juvenile
voluntarily relinquished; custody; alternative disposition; effect.

Any juvenile adjudged to be under subdivision (7) of section 43-247 shall remain in the custody
of the Department of Health and Human Services or the licensed child placement
agency to whom the juvenile has been relinquished unless the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that the best interests of the juvenile require
that an alternative disposition be made. If the court makes such finding,
then alternative disposition may be made as provided under section 43-284.
Such alternative disposition shall relieve the department or licensed child
placement agency of all responsibility with regard to such juvenile.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 182, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 131;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 21.